Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-202 Insurer's name. (a) Every
insurer shall conduct its business in its own legal name.

(b) No insurer shall assume or use a name
deceptively similar to that of any other authorized insurer, nor which tends to
deceive or mislead as to the type of organization of the insurer.

(c) When a foreign or alien insurer authorized
to do business in this State wants to change the name under which its
certificate of authority is issued, the insurer shall file a request for name
change with the commissioner at least thirty days prior to the effective date
of the name change. If within the thirty-day period the commissioner finds the
name change request does not meet the requirements of this chapter or of the
corporation laws of this State, the commissioner shall send to the insurer
written notice of disapproval of the request specifying in what respect the
proposed name change fails to meet the requirements of this chapter or the
corporation laws of this State and stating that the name change shall not become
effective. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1988, c 363, §2(2)]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next